Utah statutes.
17-50-320.   Support of the arts by counties -- Guidelines.
A county may provide for and appropriate funds for the support of the arts,
including music, dance, theatre, crafts and visual, folk and literary art, for
the purpose of enriching the lives of its residents and may establish
guidelines for the support of the arts.
